Utah statutes.
38-1-25.   Abuse of lien right -- Penalty.
(1)  Any person entitled to record or file a lien under Section 38-1-3 is
guilty of a class B misdemeanor who intentionally causes a claim of lien
against any property containing a greater demand than the sum due to be
recorded or filed:
(a)  with the intent to cloud the title;
(b)  to exact from the owner or person liable by means of the excessive claim
of lien more than is due; or
(c)  to procure any unjustified advantage or benefit.
(2)  In addition to any criminal penalties under Subsection (1), a person who
violates Subsection (1) is liable to the owner of the property or an original
contractor or subcontractor who is affected by the lien for the greater of:
(a)  twice the amount by which the abusive lien exceeds the amount actually
due; or
(b)  the actual damages incurred by the owner of the property.
